local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="lev/a__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bygg/a__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="belys/a__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anf/alla__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öll</l>
          <r>alla<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alla</l>
          <r>alla<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allit</l>
          <r>alla<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aller</l>
          <r>alla<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="begr/ava__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avde</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ava</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avt</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="inre/da__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dde</l>
          <r>da<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>da<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r>da<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="medg/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iva</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iva</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>av</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/eta__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isste</l>
          <r>eta<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eta</l>
          <r>eta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etat</l>
          <r>eta<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>eta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="st/icka__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ack</l>
          <r>icka<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ickade</l>
          <r>icka<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icka</l>
          <r>icka<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ickat</l>
          <r>icka<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uckit</l>
          <r>icka<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ickar</l>
          <r>icka<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icker</l>
          <r>icka<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/ida__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ida</l>
          <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idit</l>
          <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ider</l>
          <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/iga__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iga</l>
          <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igit</l>
          <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iger</l>
          <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/igga__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åg</l>
          <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igga</l>
          <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egat</l>
          <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igger</l>
          <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hör/a__vblex">
      <e> 
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/ilja__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ille</l>
          <r>ilja<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilja</l>
          <r>ilja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elat</l>
          <r>ilja<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ilja<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/imma__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>immade</l>
          <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imma</l>
          <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>immat</l>
          <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="anfalla"><i>anf</i><par n="anf/alla__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="begrava"><i>begr</i><par n="begr/ava__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="belysa"><i>belys</i><par n="belys/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bygga"><i>bygg</i><par n="bygg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hysa"><i>hys</i><par n="belys/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inreda"><i>inre</i><par n="inre/da__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leja"><i>lej</i><par n="bygg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leva"><i>lev</i><par n="lev/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lida"><i>l</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ligga"><i>l</i><par n="l/igga__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="medge"><i>medg</i><par n="medg/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rida"><i>r</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="simma"><i>s</i><par n="s/imma__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skylla"><i>skyll</i><par n="bygg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sticka"><i>st</i><par n="st/icka__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="strida"><i>str</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tiga"><i>t</i><par n="t/iga__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tillreda"><i>tillre</i><par n="inre/da__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trycka"><i>tryck</i><par n="belys/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tycka"><i>tyck</i><par n="belys/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uppfylla"><i>uppfyll</i><par n="bygg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="veta"><i>v</i><par n="v/eta__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vilja"><i>v</i><par n="v/ilja__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="höra"><i>hör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förhöra"><i>förhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="genomföra"><i>genomför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="föra"><i>för</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="röra"><i>rör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utföra"><i>utför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="medföra"><i>medför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tillföra"><i>tillför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slutföra"><i>slutför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bokföra"><i>bokför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="återinföra"><i>återinför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hårdföra"><i>hårdför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="provköra"><i>provkör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saluföra"><i>saluför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lagföra"><i>lagför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="samköra"><i>samkör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="upphöra"><i>upphör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="överföra"><i>överför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förföra"><i>förför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="testköra"><i>testkör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vidrör"><i>vidrör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="våldföra"><i>våldför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="folkbokföra"><i>folkbokför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="busköra"><i>buskör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avföra"><i>avför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beröra"><i>berör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förstöra"><i>förstör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fylleköra"><i>fyllekör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="införa"><i>inför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jämföra"><i>jämför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="korsförhöra"><i>korsförhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="övningsköra"><i>övningskör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vilseföra"><i>vilseför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tillhöra"><i>tillhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="krypköra"><i>krypkör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="motionsköra"><i>motionskör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lagerföra"><i>lagerföra</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
